Hawaii statutes.
[§708-812.55] Unauthorized entry in
a dwelling in the first degree. (1) A person commits the offense of
unauthorized entry in a dwelling in the first degree if the person
intentionally or knowingly enters unlawfully into a dwelling and another person
was, at the time of the entry, lawfully present in the dwelling who:

(a) Was sixty-two years of age or older;

(b) Was an incapacitated person; or

(c) Had a developmental disability.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

"Developmental disability" shall have
the same meaning as in section 333E-2.

"Incapacitated person" shall have the
same meaning as in section 560:5-102.

(3) Unauthorized entry in a dwelling in the
first degree is a class B felony.

(4) It shall be an affirmative defense that
reduces this offense to a misdemeanor that, at the time of the unlawful entry:

(a) There was a social gathering of invited guests
at the dwelling the defendant entered;

(b) The defendant intended to join the social
gathering as an invited guest; and

(c) The defendant had no intent to commit any
unlawful act other than the entry. [L 2011, c 187, §2]

COMMENTARY ON §708-812.55

Act 187, Session Laws 2011, established the offense of
unauthorized entry in a dwelling in the first degree, a class B felony, for the
unauthorized entry in a dwelling if another person, at the time of entry, was
lawfully present in the dwelling and the person was sixty-two years of age or
older, was an incapacitated person, or had a developmental disability. The
legislature found that home invasions are traumatic experiences for the victims
and may be especially frightening for vulnerable elderly and disabled
individuals present during the intrusion. The legislature intended that the
presence of a person lawfully in the dwelling shall be a strict liability
element and that it shall not be necessary to prove that a defendant knew or
had any reason to know that the person lawfully in the dwelling was sixty-two
years of age or older, incapacitated, or disabled. Conference Committee Report
No. 32.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next